District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1342

Spanish translations of District publications relating to health, safety and welfare.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-31, § 2, 24 DCR 3724
June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-167, § 8(b), 51 DCR 4688

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2342.
1973 Ed., § 6-1942.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 2-31, see Mayor’s Order 86-67, May 2, 1986.

Delegation of Authority